Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska22-113
Cass.

The county of Cass is bounded as follows: Commencing at the southwest corner of township ten, north, range nine, east; thence east to the eastern boundary line of the State of Nebraska as established by the Iowa-Nebraska Boundary Compact of 1943; thence north along said eastern boundary line until it intersects the Platte River; thence up said Platte River until it intersects the line dividing townships twelve and thirteen, north, the last time; thence west to the northwest corner of township twelve, north, range ten, east; thence south two miles; thence west six miles; and thence south to the place of beginning.

G.S.1873, c. 12, § 8, p. 213;

R.S.1913, § 826;

C.S.1922, § 728;

C.S.1929, § 25-115;

R.S.1943, § 22-113;

Laws 1955, c. 65, § 2, p. 212.

Middle of main channel is boundary between Sarpy and Cass Counties. State ex rel. Pankonin v. County Comrs. of Cass County, 58 Neb. 244, 78 N.W. 494 (1899).